Hawaii statutes.
[§167-13] Petition of land occupiers for
formation of water project. Land occupiers, including the Hawaiian homes
commission, comprising at least sixty per cent of the acreage of lands lying
within an area proposed to be organized into a water project may file a
petition with the board of agriculture requesting that the project be
organized. Where any of the lands of the petitioners in the proposed area are
leased lands, it shall be necessary for the lessor and lessee to join in the
petition. The petition shall contain a general description and the acreage of
the area proposed to be organized into a water project and shall state the
acreage owned or leased by each of the petitioners within that area. Before
the board shall commence any water project involving homesteaded lands of the
Hawaiian homes commission, it shall require the commission to assure the
payment of any acreage assessment thereon, in pursuance of section 208(5) of
the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act, 1920. [L 1987, c 306, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next